Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
CHAPTER 4 Veterans Affairs

Cross references.

Creation of veterans court division, §

15-1-17

.

Instructional activities focusing on veterans and the armed forces, §

20-2-147

.

Courtesy nonresident fishing licenses to certain paralyzed or disabled veterans, §

27-2-4.2

.

Reports on veterans exposed to Agent Orange, T. 31, C. 30.

Unemployment benefit rights of persons who entered armed services during period of national emergency, §

34-8-157

.

Authority of counties, cities, and others to furnish buildings, offices, and meeting halls to nationally recognized veterans’ organizations, §

38-1-2

.

Special license plates for disabled veterans, §

40-2-68

et seq.

Special license plates for former prisoners of war, §

40-2-73

.

Veterans’, honorary, and distinctive drivers’ licenses, §

40-5-36

.

Point credit for veterans taking examinations given by state examining boards, §

43-1-9

et seq.

License fee exemptions for disabled veterans conducting businesses or peddling operations in counties and municipalities, T. 43, C. 12.

Civil service preference for veterans generally, § 45-2-20 et seq.

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1985, p. 576), the General Assembly designated the North Rome Connector between Highway 53 and Highway 27 in the City of Rome as the “Veterans Memorial Highway.” By resolution (Ga. L. 1988, p. 803), the General Assembly authorized the Georgia Veterans of Foreign Wars to place a bust of the late James H. “Sloppy” Floyd in the foyer of the James H. “Sloppy” Floyd Veterans Memorial Building. By resolution (Ga. L. 1988, p. 2071), the General Assembly authorized the Georgia Building Authority to select a site on the grounds of the James H. “Sloppy” Floyd Veterans Memorial Building to erect the Vietnam Memorial.